Maryland, session 2026, HB1248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
1–101.
(a) In this Division I of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(f) Unless expressly provided otherwise, “Department” means the Department of
Budget and Management.
(j) “Position” means an employment assignment of duties and responsibilities
that requires the full–time employment of one individual or less than full–time employment
of one or more individuals.
7–701.
(a) [In] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 7–702 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IN this [title]
SUBTITLE, “part–time employee” means an employee who works an average of 50% or more
but less than 100% of the regular workweek.

HOUSE BILL 1248 3
(b) An individual who is a full–time employee who is qualified for or desires to be
a full–time employee may not be required to accept part–time employment as a condition
of continued or new State employment.
(c) An individual who is a part–time employee who is qualified for or desires to
be a part–time employee may not be required to accept full–time employment as a condition
of continued or new State employment.
(d) (1) In accordance with regulations adopted by the Secretary, a part–time
employee is entitled to receive all employment rights, privileges, and benefits that are
normally available to a full–time employee in a similar position with a similar grade and
length of service.
(2) Benefits shall be prorated in proportion to the number of hours
employed.
7–702.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PART–TIME EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE WHO WORKS LESS
THAN 100% OF FULL–TIME EMPLOYMENT AND WHOSE POSITION DUTIES:
(I) DO NOT STEM FROM A PARENT OR ORIGINATING POSITION
IDENTIFICATION NUMBER; AND
(II) ARE NOT MEANT TO BE SHARED WITH ANOTHER EMPLOYEE.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE PART–TIME STATE EMPLOYMENT
PILOT PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A PART–TIME STATE EMPLOYMENT PILOT PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROMOTE AND SUPPORT THE
INCLUSIVITY OF STATE EMPLOYMENT BY INCREASING THE AVAILABILITY OF
PART–TIME POSITIONS WITH BENEFITS IN STATE GOVERNMENT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SELECT FIVE AGENCIES IN THE EXECUTIVE
BRANCH OF STATE GOVERNMENT WITH A BROAD AND DIVERSE REPRESENTATION
OF POSITIONS AND POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 1248
(E) (1) EACH STATE AGENCY SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
EVALUATE FULL–TIME POSITION VACANCIES WITHIN THE AGENCY AS THE
POSITIONS BECOME AVAILABLE TO DETERMINE WHETHER ANY OF THE VACANT
FULL–TIME POSITIONS COULD BE CONVERTED TO TWO PART–TIME POSITIONS WITH
BENEFITS.
(2) IF A STATE AGENCY DETERMINES THAT THERE ARE NO VACANT
FULL–TIME POSITIONS WITHIN THE AGENCY THAT ARE ELIGIBLE FOR CONVERSION
TO TWO PART–TIME POSITIONS, THE AGENCY SHALL DOCUMENT THE REASONS FOR
THE DETERMINATION.
(F) IF A STATE AGENCY DETERMINES THAT A VACANT FULL–TIME POSITION
IS ELIGIBLE FOR CONVERSION TO TWO PART–TIME POSITIONS, THE AGENCY SHALL:
(1) CONVERT THE FULL–TIME POSITION TO TWO PART–TIME
POSITIONS; AND
(2) ADVERTISE AND RECRUIT FOR THE VACANCY AS TWO PART–TIME
POSITIONS.
(G) IN ADDITION TO EVALUATING VACANT FULL–TIME POSITIONS AS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION, A STATE AGENCY
SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM MAY
EVALUATE ANY OTHER FULL–TIME POSITIONS FOR POTENTIAL SUITABILITY FOR
CONVERSION TO TWO PART–TIME POSITIONS.
(H) A SUPERVISOR WHOSE DUTIES NORMALLY INCLUDE SUPERVISING AN
INDIVIDUAL IN A FULL–TIME POSITION THAT IS CONVERTED TO TWO PART–TIME
POSITIONS UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY NOT HAVE THEIR SUPERVISORY DUTIES
INCREASED BY MORE THAN ONE INDIVIDUAL AS A RESULT OF THE CONVERSION OF
FULL–TIME POSITIONS.
(I) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 AND DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING
DECEMBER 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE STATUS OF THE ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATIONS BY EACH
STATE AGENCY PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) THE NUMBER OF NEW PART–TIME EMPLOYEES HIRED BY EACH
STATE AGENCY PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 1248 5
(a) There is a Workgroup for an Inclusive State Workplace.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary of Budget and Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) the Comptroller, or the Comptroller’s designee;
(3) the Secretary of Information Technology, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Aging, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Executive Director of the Maryland Commission for Women, or the
Executive Director’s designee;
(7) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(8) the Deputy Secretary of the Developmental Disabilities
Administration, or the Deputy Secretary of Disabilities, or the Secretary’s designee;
(9) one representative from the Maryland Department of Health the
Secretary of Transportation, or the Secretary’s designee;
(10) the Chancellor of the University System of Maryland, or the
Chancellor’s designee;
(11) one representative from a State employees union, appointed by the
Governor;
(12) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(12) (13) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker
of the House; and
(13) (14) any representative appointed by the Governor under subsection
(c) of this section.
(c) The Governor may appoint the following members to the Workgroup:
(1) a representative who is actively engaged in the caregiving community;
(2) a representative who is actively engaged in the disabilities community;
(3) a representative who is actively engaged in the healthcare community;

HOUSE BILL 1248
(4) a representative who is actively engaged in the older adult community;
and
(5) a representative from a State employees union; and
(6) an economist with expertise in labor economics.
(d) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Workgroup.
(e) The Department of Budget and Management shall provide staff for the
Workgroup.
(f) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) (1) The Workgroup shall begin meeting before October 1, 2026.
(2) The Workgroup shall:
(1) outline the steps the State needs to take to offer more inclusive
employment opportunities for caregivers, people with disabilities or other medical
conditions, older adults, and other individuals challenged by the traditional full–time
employment structure;
(2) establish guidance for State agencies to create part–time jobs with
benefits;
(3) set annual goals to expand part–time job opportunities with benefits,
as well as other strategies for inclusion, for each of the next 5 years;
(4) identify any potential statutory changes required to implement the
inclusive employment plan devised by the Workgroup; and
(5) identify and quantify the long–term economic benefits to the State from
increased labor force participation by caregivers, people with disabilities or other medical
conditions, older adults, and other individuals challenged by the traditional, full–time
employment structure.
(i) outline the steps the State needs to take to encourage the
expansion of part–time employment within the State Personnel Management System, the
University System of Maryland, and the Department of Transportation;

HOUSE BILL 1248 7
(ii) focus on the inclusive employment opportunities in State
government and removing obstacles for individuals challenged by full–time employment;
(iii) review the current policies and procedures concerning part–time
employment in State government;
(iv) analyze the budgetary incentives, recruitment best practices, and
support structures currently in place to encourage hiring of part–time, benefit–eligible
employees;
(v) study the economic and operational effects and quantify the
long–term economic benefits of part–time employment on households and State government;
(vi) suggest timelines and identify methods and associated metrics for
expanding part–time employment opportunities; and
(vii) identify any potential statutory changes required to implement
the steps identified by the Workgroup.
(h) On or before September 15, 2027, the Workgroup shall share its inclusive
workplace implementation strategy and workplan provide its findings and
recommendations in a report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article.
(i) On or before December 31, 2027, the Department of Budget and Management
shall develop and distribute guidance to State agencies on expanding part–time employment
opportunities, taking into consideration the findings and recommendations of the
Workgroup.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029
2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.